el: Συμβατότητα μεγέθους μπαστουνιού κρίκετ: Harrow; Παιδικό; Μακριά λαβή (LH); Κοντή λαβή (SH); Μέγεθος 1; Μέγεθος 2; Μέγεθος 3; Μέγεθος 4; Μέγεθος 5; Μέγεθος 6; Άλλο
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su kriketo lazdos dydžiu: „Harrow“; Jaunių; Ilga rankena (LH); Trumpa rankena (SH); 1 dydis; 2 dydis; 3 dydis; 4 dydis; 5 dydis; 6 dydis; Kita
es: Compatibilidad del tamaño del bate de críquet: Harrow; Junior; Mango largo (LH); Mango corto (SH); Talla 1; Talla 2; Talla 3; Talla 4; Talla 5; Talla 6; Otro
nl: Compatibiliteit van cricketbats met verschillende matenCricketbat maatcompatibiliteit: Harrow; Junior; Lange handgreep (LH); Korte handgreep (SH); Maat 1; Maat 2; Maat 3; Maat 4; Maat 5; Maat 6; Overig
sk-SK: Kompatibilita veľkosti kriketovej pálky: Harrow; Junior; Dlhá rukoväť (LH); Krátka rukoväť (SH); Veľkosť 1; Veľkosť 2; Veľkosť 3; Veľkosť 4; Veľkosť 5; Veľkosť 6; Iné
pt-PT: Compatibilidade de tamanho de taco de críquete: Harrow; Júnior; Cabo longo (LH); Cabo curto (SH); Tamanho 1; Tamanho 2; Tamanho 3; Tamanho 4; Tamanho 5; Tamanho 6; Outro
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของขนาดไม้คริกเก็ต: Harrow; จูเนียร์; ด้ามยาว (LH); ด้ามสั้น (SH); ขนาด 1; ขนาด 2; ขนาด 3; ขนาด 4; ขนาด 5; ขนาด 6; อื่นๆ
ko: 크리켓 배트 사이즈 호환성: 해로우; 주니어; 롱 핸들(LH); 숏 핸들(SH); 사이즈 1; 사이즈 2; 사이즈 3; 사이즈 4; 사이즈 5; 사이즈 6; 기타
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de tamanho do taco de críquete: Harrow; Júnior; Cabo longo (LH); Cabo curto (SH); Tamanho 1; Tamanho 2; Tamanho 3; Tamanho 4; Tamanho 5; Tamanho 6; Outro
sv: Cricketträ – storlekskompatibilitet: Harrow; Junior; Långt handtag (LH); Kort handtag (SH); Storlek 1; Storlek 2; Storlek 3; Storlek 4; Storlek 5; Storlek 6; Övrigt
zh-TW: 板球棒尺寸相容性: Harrow; 青少年; 長柄 (LH); 短柄 (SH); 尺寸 1; 尺寸 2; 尺寸 3; 尺寸 4; 尺寸 5; 尺寸 6; 其他
ja: クリケットバットのサイズ互換性: ハロー; ジュニア; ロングハンドル (LH); ショートハンドル (SH); サイズ 1; サイズ 2; サイズ 3; サイズ 4; サイズ 5; サイズ 6; その他
vi: Khả năng tương thích kích thước gậy cricket: Harrow; Trẻ em; Cán dài (LH); Cán ngắn (SH); Cỡ 1; Cỡ 2; Cỡ 3; Cỡ 4; Cỡ 5; Cỡ 6; Khác
da: Kompatibilitet med cricketbatstørrelser: Harrow; Junior; Langt håndtag (LH); Kort håndtag (SH); Str. 1; Str. 2; Str. 3; Str. 4; Str. 5; Str. 6; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместимост с размер на бухалка за крикет: Harrow; Юношески; Дълга дръжка (LH); Къса дръжка (SH); Размер 1; Размер 2; Размер 3; Размер 4; Размер 5; Размер 6; Други
ru: Совместимость по размеру биты для крикета: Harrow; Юниорский; Длинная рукоятка (LH); Короткая рукоятка (SH); Размер 1; Размер 2; Размер 3; Размер 4; Размер 5; Размер 6; Другое
nb: Kompatibilitet for cricketkøllestørrelse: Harrow; Junior; Langt håndtak (LH); Kort håndtak (SH); Størrelse 1; Størrelse 2; Størrelse 3; Størrelse 4; Størrelse 5; Størrelse 6; Annet
cs: Kompatibilita velikostí kriketových pálek: Harrow; Juniorská; Dlouhá rukojeť (LH); Krátká rukojeť (SH); Velikost 1; Velikost 2; Velikost 3; Velikost 4; Velikost 5; Velikost 6; Ostatní
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličina palica za kriket: Harrow; Juniorska; Duga drška (LH); Kratka drška (SH); Veličina 1; Veličina 2; Veličina 3; Veličina 4; Veličina 5; Veličina 6; Ostalo
pl: Kompatybilność rozmiaru kija do krykieta: Harrow; Junior; Długa rączka (LH); Krótka rączka (SH); Rozmiar 1; Rozmiar 2; Rozmiar 3; Rozmiar 4; Rozmiar 5; Rozmiar 6; Inne
it: Compatibilità della taglia della mazza da cricket: Harrow; Junior; Manico lungo (LH); Manico corto (SH); Taglia 1; Taglia 2; Taglia 3; Taglia 4; Taglia 5; Taglia 6; Altro
en: Cricket bat size compatibility: Harrow; Junior; Long Handle (LH); Short Handle (SH); Size 1; Size 2; Size 3; Size 4; Size 5; Size 6; Other
fr: Compatibilité avec les tailles de battes de cricket: Harrow; Junior; Manche long (LH); Manche court (SH); Taille 1; Taille 2; Taille 3; Taille 4; Taille 5; Taille 6; Autre
hu: Krikettütőméret kompatibilitása: Harrow; Junior; Hosszú nyél (LH); Rövid nyél (SH); 1-es méret; 2-es méret; 3-as méret; 4-es méret; 5-ös méret; 6-os méret; Egyéb
de: Größenkompatibilität für Cricketschläger: Harrow; Junior; Langer Griff (LH); Kurzer Griff (SH); Größe 1; Größe 2; Größe 3; Größe 4; Größe 5; Größe 6; Sonstige
tr: Kriket sopası boyut uyumluluğu: Harrow; Genç; Uzun saplı (LH); Kısa saplı (SH); Beden 1; Beden 2; Beden 3; Beden 4; Beden 5; Beden 6; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljivost velikosti kijev za kriket: Harrow; Junior; Dolg ročaj (LH); Kratek ročaj (SH); Velikost 1; Velikost 2; Velikost 3; Velikost 4; Velikost 5; Velikost 6; Drugo
zh-CN: 板球拍尺寸适配性: Harrow; 青少年; 长柄 (LH); 短柄 (SH); 尺寸 1; 尺寸 2; 尺寸 3; 尺寸 4; 尺寸 5; 尺寸 6; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate dimensiune bâtă de cricket: Harrow; Junior; Mâner lung (LH); Mâner scurt (SH); Mărimea 1; Mărimea 2; Mărimea 3; Mărimea 4; Mărimea 5; Mărimea 6; Altele
fi: Krikettimailan koon yhteensopivuus: Harrow; Juniori; Pitkä kahva (LH); Lyhyt kahva (SH); Koko 1; Koko 2; Koko 3; Koko 4; Koko 5; Koko 6; Muu